California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [62521. - 62521.]

62521.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Acceptable security” means a surety bond from an admitted insurer, deposits of government securities, a letter of credit, or other form of performance guarantee acceptable to the secretary and meeting the requirements as acceptable security pursuant to law. Any instrument used as acceptable security shall contain provisions the secretary may prescribe, shall have an effective life of no less than two years, shall name the secretary as the beneficiary of the instrument, shall be clean and irrevocable if the security is a letter of credit, shall provide that the
 secretary
 may draw upon it up to the total amount in the event of the handler’s payment default, and, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), shall be verified to the secretary as being in effect and complying with the provisions of this chapter at the end of every six-month interval following the date on which a handler originally posts the instrument. Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), acceptable securities provided to the secretary shall not be released by the secretary unless the handler’s average monthly purchases, as determined annually by the secretary, fall below thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) or the fund cash, whichever is higher. Any interest accrued by the instrument shall be the property, and for the benefit, of the handler posting the instrument.

(2) Subject to the provisions of this chapter, a
 handler who has posted an acceptable security shall have the right to replace that instrument with a new acceptable security meeting the requirements of this chapter at the end of every six-month interval following the date on which the handler originally posted the instrument. The secretary shall release the issuer of any acceptable security from all past, present, or future obligations secured by the acceptable security upon the secretary’s acceptance of replacement security meeting the requirements of this chapter and the secretary shall then provide written confirmation to the issuer of the original acceptable security that an acceptable replacement security had been provided.

(3) Upon receipt of an affidavit confirming that the amount paid under an acceptable security posted pursuant to this chapter was equal to the total amount
 of that instrument, the secretary shall release the issuer of that acceptable security from all past, present, and future liability. Upon receipt of an affidavit confirming any other amount paid by an issuer under an acceptable security posted pursuant to this chapter, the secretary shall release the issuer of that security to the extent of the issuer’s payment.

(b) “Board” means the Milk Producers Security Trust Fund Board.

(c) “Eligible milk” means milk, whether pooled or nonpooled, that meets both of the following criteria for coverage by the fund, regardless of whether the milk meets other criteria necessary for coverage:

(1) The criterion in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 62580, relating to milk
 being produced and delivered within the state.

(2) The criterion in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 62580, relating to a producer not having a beneficial ownership interest in the handler to whom shipments are made.

(d) (1) “Federal Milk Marketing Order” means the Federal Milk Marketing Order established by the final rule, effective October 17, 2018, published by the United States Department of Agriculture in Volume 83 of the Federal Register, beginning on page 26547, on Friday, June 8, 2018.

(2) References in this chapter to a section of the Federal Milk Marketing Order are references to that section of Part 1051 (commencing with Section 1051.1) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal
 Regulations.

(e) “Fund” means the Milk Producers Security Trust Fund created pursuant to Section 62506.

(f) “Fund cash” means the combined value of the security charges collected pursuant to Section 62560 and 62561, any amounts paid under a security posted pursuant to this chapter, amounts reimbursed to the fund, including any accrued interest collected and authorized by law to be deposited in the fund with that reimbursement, penalties collected and authorized by law to be deposited in the fund, and any increments received pursuant to Section 62573.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), “fund surplus” means the portion of fund cash at any particular time that consists of increments
 received by the fund pursuant to Section 62573.

(2) If payment of producer claims pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 62620) reduces the fund cash to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), “fund surplus” shall thereafter mean the amount by which the fund cash exceeds thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(h) “Handler” means any person who as owner, agent, broker, or intermediary, either directly or indirectly, receives, purchases, or otherwise acquires ownership, possession, or control of milk in unprocessed or bulk form from a producer or a producer-handler for the purpose of manufacturing, processing, selling, or other handling. It includes nonprofit cooperative associations that, either directly or indirectly, receive, purchase, or otherwise acquire ownership,
 possession, or control of milk from other handlers or producers who are nonmembers of the nonprofit cooperative association.

(i) “Milk” means bulk whole milk, bulk reduced-fat milk, bulk lowfat milk, bulk skim milk, bulk condensed skim, and bulk cream, and any other combination of these products that have not had nondairy ingredients added. It does not include milk that has been packaged in bottles, cartons, dispenser cans, or other consumer packages.

(j) “Nonpooled milk” means milk that is not subject to the pricing and pooling provisions of the Federal Milk Marketing Order.

(k) “Nonprofit cooperative association” means a nonprofit cooperative association, as defined in Section 1051.18 of the Federal Milk
 Marketing Order, of producers, as defined in Section 1051.12 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order, that is organized and existing under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20.

(l) “Producer” means any person who produces milk from five or more cows whose bulk milk is received, acquired, or handled by a handler. It includes a nonprofit cooperative association in the sale of milk of its member producers to other handlers.

(m) “Statistical uniform price” means the Producer Price Differential (PPD), adjusted by the location of the plant of first receipt, added to the announced class III price at the standard component tests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 12.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Milk Producers Security Trust Fund Board [62540. - 62543.]

62540.

(a) The secretary shall appoint a Milk Producers Security Trust Fund Board consisting of seven members.

(b) All appointments shall be for a term of three years, and no member shall be appointed to more than three consecutive three-year terms.

(c) Members of the board shall include three milk producers, two representatives of handlers licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801), and two nonproducer members representing nonprofit cooperative associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 13.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62541.

Each member of the board shall be paid one hundred dollars ($100) per day plus travel expenses, including expenses for lodging and meals, which are incurred in the attendance at board meetings or in conducting the business of the board. All per diem and expense claims are subject to approval by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 14.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62542.

The board shall advise the secretary on the administration of the fund, including, but not limited to, the amount of the fund defaults under this chapter and the implementation of the security charge necessary to accomplish its functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 15.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62543.

The board may, by contract, with the approval of the secretary, engage the services of an accounting firm or other consultants or agencies that the board determines to be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 16.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Financing Plan [62560. - 62574.]

62560.

(a) The security charges provided for in Section 62561 shall be collected until January 1, 2007. Unless otherwise permitted by this section, the secretary shall thereafter discontinue collection of the security charges. The fund shall consist of the fund cash, the value of any alternative financial instrument, and acceptable securities provided by handlers pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) If, after January 1, 2007, payment of producer claims reduces the fund cash below thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), the secretary may resume collecting security charges in order that the fund cash is thereafter maintained at thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).
 Security charges necessary to return the fund cash to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall, subject to subdivision (c), be collected from all handlers making purchases of eligible milk, including handlers who have posted acceptable securities pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) If, in any month, 110 percent of any handler’s average monthly eligible milk purchases, computed over the preceding 12 months, unless the increase in value of eligible milk purchases is the result of substantial business expansion or the result of a merger or acquisition, in which case the 12-month computation requirement does not apply, exceeds the fund cash as of the end of that month, or thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), whichever is higher, the secretary shall require that handler to provide acceptable securities, as calculated consistent with subdivision
 (e),
 within 10 working days in an amount equal to the difference between the fund cash or thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), whichever is higher, and 110 percent of that handler’s average monthly eligible milk purchases. When handlers have provided acceptable securities covering the difference, the secretary shall not collect security charges from those handlers for the portion of their average monthly eligible milk purchases covered by acceptable securities. Shipments to handlers failing to provide acceptable securities within 10 working days of notice by the secretary of the obligation to post acceptable securities, as required by this subdivision, shall be listed by the secretary as ineligible for coverage under the fund pursuant to Section 62586.

(d) The secretary shall calculate the value of handlers’ average
 monthly eligible milk purchases at least once each year for those handlers whose previous average monthly eligible milk purchases exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000). If, as a result of any such calculation, the secretary determines that a handler must provide additional acceptable securities, as calculated consistent with subdivision (e), to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (c), that handler shall provide additional acceptable securities within 10 working days of notice by the secretary.

(e) In calculating the amount of an acceptable security pursuant to subdivision (c) or (d), the secretary shall not take into account milk that a handler purchases from a producer with a beneficial ownership interest in the handler, as defined for purposes of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 62580.

(f) In the event a handler fails to comply with subdivision (d):

(1) In addition to paying all other amounts required by this chapter, including any security charges then in effect under subdivision (a) of Section 62561, that handler shall pay an enhanced security charge on all eligible milk purchased to be computed as follows:

(A) 3.2 mills ($0.0032) per pound for fat contained in eligible milk of any class referred to in Section 1051.40 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order, whether pooled or nonpooled.

(B) 1.3 mills ($0.0013) per pound for solids-not-fat contained in eligible milk of any class referred to in Section 1051.40 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order,
 whether pooled or nonpooled.

(2) A handler shall be liable for the enhanced security charges required by this section until the handler provides the required additional acceptable securities to the secretary. Notwithstanding
 subdivision (b), enhanced security charges paid pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited into the fund and become part of the fund cash.

(g) If a handler fails to timely provide acceptable securities, or additional acceptable securities, as required by this section, the secretary shall promptly give notice of that fact to all producers who have a contract on file with the secretary, all nonprofit cooperative associations, and other interested parties. A handler failing to post acceptable securities may also be subject to revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal or placement of conditions upon the handler’s license pursuant to Sections 62146, 62149, and 62151.

(h) In consultation with the board, the secretary may consider and use alternative financial instruments, in
 addition to, or in lieu of, using security charges to meet the financial security requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 17.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62561.

(a) The following security charges shall be in effect for any period for which the secretary has implemented collections under this chapter:

(1) 3.2 mills ($0.0032) per pound for fat contained in eligible milk of any class referred to in Section 1051.40 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order, whether pooled or nonpooled.

(2) 1.3 mills ($0.0013) per pound for solids-not-fat contained in eligible milk of any class referred to in Section 1051.40 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order, whether pooled or nonpooled.

(b) The secretary is only
 authorized by this article to collect security charges on eligible milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 18.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62563.

The amount of any handler’s obligation attributable to the security charges established pursuant to Section 62561 shall be remitted by the secretary to the fund by the end of the month following the month in which payment for the milk is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 20.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62565.

Security charges shall be collected by the secretary through direct payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 23.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62566.

The secretary may add a penalty of 10 percent to amounts that are not paid when due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 24.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62567.

If any handler or producer-handler does not provide the information necessary to determine the amount due, when required, the secretary shall estimate the amount due from the records of the department or from any other source of information that is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 25.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62568.

The secretary may take all appropriate action against any person to recover any unpaid amounts. In any action, a declaration by the secretary that states the amount required to be paid, including penalty, is prima facie evidence of the delinquency. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 26.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62569.

(a) Any money that is collected by the secretary pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in a bank or other depository that is approved by the secretary. Funds that are so collected are exempt from Sections 11270 and 11272 of the Government Code and shall be deposited and disbursed only to pay for milk produced and delivered within this state, that has not been otherwise paid for, including attorney’s fees and other costs incurred in litigation involving the fund, expenses generated by the auditing requirement imposed by Section 62570, expenses generated by the use of alternative financial instruments pursuant to Section 62560, and the costs set forth in Section 62573. The expenditure of those funds is
 exempt from Section 925.6 of the Government Code.

(b) Nothing in this section prevents the secretary from using the increment received from investment, reinvestment, or deposit of money specified in Section 62573, in the manner provided by Section 62574.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 27.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62570.

All fund activities shall be subject to an audit at least once every two years by an auditing firm recommended by the board and selected by the secretary. A copy of the audit shall be delivered to the secretary within 30 days after completion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 28.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62571.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, any money that is collected by the secretary pursuant to this chapter is hereby continuously appropriated to the secretary to carry out only those purposes provided for in Section 62569. The appropriation that is made in this section is exempt from Section 16304 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 29.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62572.

Any money that is deposited pursuant to Section 62569, which the secretary determines is available for investment, may be invested or reinvested by the Treasurer in any of the securities described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or placed in a depository as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) of that part, and handled in the same manner as money in the State Treasury. For these purposes, the money may also be combined with funds determined by the secretary to be available for investment pursuant to Section 58939.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 30.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62573.

(a) Any increment that is received from investment, reinvestment, or deposit of money pursuant to Section 62572 shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. The Treasurer may deduct from this remittance an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred in carrying out Section 62572 and this section or may bill the secretary for the costs, and the secretary shall pay the costs from money collected pursuant to this chapter.

 (b) Nothing in this section prevents the secretary from using the increment in a manner provided by Section 62574.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 31.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62574.

Immediately following the payment to the fund of the increment provided in Section 62573, the secretary may, after consultation with the board, transfer an amount equal to one-half of that increment to the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund to be used to reduce the producer assessments collected pursuant to Section 62660.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 32.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Milk Producers Security Trust Fund Coverage [62580. - 62587.]

62580.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, milk shipped by a producer to a handler who meets all of the following criteria shall be considered for coverage pursuant to this chapter:

(1) A valid contract between the producer and handler pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61310) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801) has been filed with the secretary before the date the milk was shipped, unless the shipment was made in the first five days after the contract was executed. Filing may be accomplished by providing the department electronic notification of the contract.

(2) The handler was licensed and bonded as required by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801) when the contract was filed with the secretary.

(3) The milk was produced within the state and delivered to a plant within the state.

(4) The secretary has not issued a prior notice that the shipments would not be covered by the fund.

(5) The shipment was not made under a custom processing arrangement with the producer retaining title.

(6) (A) The producer shipping the milk had a direct contract with the handler. Milk shipped to a handler under a contract held by intermediaries, brokers, or agents is
 not covered.

(B) In the case of a nonprofit cooperative association, only the milk of its members shipped under the contract is covered. Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), milk shipped by a nonprofit cooperative association to a handler under a contract held by another nonprofit cooperative association, as verified by the secretary, is covered.

(7) (A) The producer does not have a beneficial ownership interest in the handler to whom shipments were made.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the term “beneficial ownership interest” means the holding of any ownership share in the handler to whom shipments are made, or, if the handler is a publicly traded company, an ownership share of more than 1 percent.

(8) The producer is in compliance with this chapter.

(b) Milk shall not be excluded from coverage pursuant to this chapter due to its pooled or nonpooled status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 33.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62580.5.

Any producer entity, including a nonprofit cooperative association that severs a disqualifying beneficial ownership interest in a handler to whom it supplies bulk milk, shall not have trust fund coverage for future milk shipments to that handler for a period of 12 months after notice is given to the secretary of termination of the beneficial ownership interest unless a waiver is granted subject to Section 62587.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 34.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62581.

Only shipments which occur during the first 35 days from the date of the earliest shipment for which a producer has not been paid are eligible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

62582.

If future shipments to a handler are not eligible for coverage under this chapter in the event of a default, the secretary shall notify all producers who have a contract on file with the secretary, all nonprofit cooperative associations, and other interested parties. Future shipments shall not be eligible when any of the following events occur:

(a) The handler fails to maintain a valid license or bond as required under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801).

(b) The handler fails to pay producers as required under Section 1051.73 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order, or, in the case of
 nonpooled or Grade B milk, by the contract filed with the secretary pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 62580.

(c) The handler fails to submit, when requested by the secretary, executed contracts that establish the relationship between affected parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 35.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62583.

If, on the date of the notice issued pursuant to Section 62582, a producer has a contract with the handler which is on file with the secretary, and that producer has received payment from a handler whose milk purchases have been declared ineligible, shipments by that producer which occur more than five days from the date of the notice of ineligibility issued by the secretary will not be considered in determining any claim the producer may make against the fund, unless the secretary reestablishes eligibility for future shipments to be covered by the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 236, Sec. 8.   Effective August 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

62584.

If, on the date of the notice issued pursuant to Section 62582, a producer does not have a contract with the handler which is on file with the secretary, shipments by that producer which occur more than five days from the date of the notice of ineligibility issued by the secretary will not be considered in determining any claim the producer may make against the fund, unless the secretary reestablishes eligibility for future shipments to be covered by the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 236, Sec. 9.   Effective August 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

62585.

If the secretary issues a notice pursuant to Section 62582, the secretary may again qualify shipments to the handler if the handler has corrected the deficiency upon which the notice was originally issued and has done all of the following: 

(a) Paid all amounts owed to producers, including interest. Producers are not entitled to receive interest on amounts for which they have been paid by the fund after the date of payment by the fund.

(b) Reimbursed the fund for any payments made by the fund due to a default by the handler plus interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum from the date of payment by the
 fund.

(c) Paid any assessments, penalties, or other amounts owed under federal, state, or local laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 36.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62586.

The secretary shall, at least monthly, publish a current list of all handlers to whom shipments are not eligible for coverage under the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 37.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62587.

The secretary may waive any of the provisions of this article if, after consultation with the board, the secretary finds that a hardship would be imposed on persons subject to this chapter that is not consistent with the intent of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 38.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Discovery and Notification of Default in Payments [62600. - 62604.]

62600.

Any producer who does not receive payment for milk sold or delivered to a handler in the manner required by Section 1051.73 of the Federal Milk Marketing Order, or, in the case of nonpooled or Grade B milk, as required by the contract, shall immediately notify the secretary. Failure to notify the secretary within two business days of nonperformance of electronic fund transfer payments shall result in a one-day reduction in total days covered for each day of failure to notify the secretary of nonpayment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 39.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62601.

The secretary shall, upon the secretary’s own motion or upon information from a producer, producer representative, or any other person, immediately take whatever action is necessary to determine whether a payment default has occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 40.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62603.

If the secretary determines that a payment default has occurred, the secretary shall notify the handler that it has one business day from receipt of the notification to correct the payment deficiency. If the secretary determines that a payment default has not occurred, the secretary shall so notify the handler and complaining party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 42.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62604.

When a payment default has occurred, which was not corrected within one business day after notification, the secretary shall issue a notice pursuant to Section 62582 which identifies the defaulting handler and informs producers of the provisions of Sections 62583 and 62584. The notice shall also inform producers of their rights to file claims pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 62620).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 43.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Producer Claims [62620. - 62625.]

62620.

If the secretary determines that the fund is liable for any nonpayments to producers, the secretary shall provide to the producers, who have a contract with the defaulting handler on file with the secretary, a claim form. The claim form, which shall be verified, shall be returned to the secretary within 60 days from the date the claim forms are mailed by the secretary. The producer need only verify that a nonpayment has occurred. The amount of the nonpayment shall be determined by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 44.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62621.

If a verified claim form is not filed as required by Section 62620, the secretary and the fund are relieved of any further duty or liability pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 45.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62622.

Upon receipt of all verified claim forms from producers or the expiration of the time allowed to file claims, whichever occurs first, the secretary shall calculate the amount due each producer and shall notify each producer of their calculated amount and the relationship that amount bears to the total of all claims. Any producer not satisfied with the determination of the secretary may, within 30 days of receiving the notice pursuant to this section, request the secretary to review the producer’s calculated amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 46.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62623.

For purposes of this chapter, the amounts owed to the producers shall be calculated as follows:

(a) Only shipments that occur during the first 35 days from the date of the earliest shipment for which a producer has not been paid shall be used.

(b) For all eligible milk, whether pooled or nonpooled, the price specified in the contract with the handler or the statistical uniform price, as defined in Section 62521, whichever is lower, shall be used.

(c) Deductions shall be made for those items that the handler has remitted on the producer’s behalf, and
 for which documentation of remittance has been presented, unless the deductions are
 unauthorized.

(d) The producer’s share of any bond recovery under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301) or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801) shall be deducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 47.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62624.

Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) shall be deducted from the total of the amount owed to all producers, as calculated in Section 62623, and the balance shall be paid from the fund on a pro rata basis. The amount calculated pursuant to Section 62623 shall be the basis for prorating.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

62625.

A prorated payment shall be made to all affected producers based on the amount payable pursuant to Section 62624 when there is not sufficient money in the fund. Additional payments shall be made on a quarterly basis until the total amount due is paid. Each payment shall take into consideration all claims that have been partially satisfied and new claims approved since the previous payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 55.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Administration [62660. - 62667.]

62660.

(a) The secretary shall collect from each producer three and three-tenths mills ($0.0033) per hundredweight of all milk, whether pooled or nonpooled, to defray the reasonable costs of administering this chapter, except costs for which the fund is liable, as provided for in Section 62569.

(b) The secretary may fix the rate of the assessment authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) at a lesser or greater amount and may adjust the rate of the assessment as the secretary determines necessary to defray the reasonable costs of administering this chapter.

(c) Moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, created pursuant to Section 221, and shall be continuously appropriated to the department pursuant to Section 62571.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 371, Sec. 5.   (AB 425)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

62661.

The secretary is the instrumentality of this state for the purpose of administering and enforcing this chapter and to execute the legislative intent expressed in this chapter, and is hereby vested with the administrative authority specified in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 50.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62662.

The secretary may exercise any or all of the powers conferred by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code upon the head of a department with respect to hearings and investigations under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 51.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62663.

For purposes of enforcing this chapter, the secretary may investigate any and all transactions between producers and handlers, between nonprofit cooperative associations and producers, and among handlers. For that purpose, the secretary shall have access to, and may enter at all reasonable hours, any place where milk is being stored, bottled, or manufactured and where milk is being bought, sold, or handled, or where the books, papers, records, or documents that relate to those transactions are kept. The secretary may inspect and copy those books, papers, records, or documents at any place within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 52.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62665.

Any order of the secretary made pursuant to this chapter that substantially affects the rights of any directly affected party shall be subject to judicial review upon petition to the appropriate court. The petition shall be filed within 30 days after the effective date of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 53.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62666.

Any producer who recovers from the fund shall subrogate to the secretary all rights of recovery against any person or organization, and the producer shall execute and deliver to the secretary instruments and papers and perform any other acts necessary to carry out this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 54.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

62667.

Any payments made to producers from the fund due to a handler’s default shall accrue interest at the rate of 12 percent per annum from the date of payment. The payments and accrued interest is a judgment against the defaulting handler. The judgment shall be considered a lien on all real and personal property of the defaulting handler. The secretary may file the lien for record with any county recorder where a defaulting handler’s property is located and shall specify the amount owed, the name of the handler, the federal social security number or the federal employer tax number if known, and the last known address of the handler. The lien shall remain in full force and effect until the handler has repaid to the fund an amount equal
 to the default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 55.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Equalization Pools [62700. - 62731.]

62700.

The production and distribution of fluid milk and fluid cream is hereby declared to be a business affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health and welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 927.)
-------------------------------------------

62701.

It is hereby declared that fluid milk and fluid cream are necessary articles of food for human consumption; that the production and maintenance of an adequate supply of healthful milk of proper chemical and physical content, free from contamination, is vital to public health and welfare, and that the production, transportation, processing, storage, distribution and sale of fluid milk and fluid cream in the State of California is an industry, in whole and in part, affecting public health and welfare; that unfair, unjust, destructive and demoralizing trade practices have appeared within this industry and these practices constitute a menace to the health and welfare of the inhabitants of this state by threatening the stability of this industry and by thereby endangering the assurance to the people of the State of California of the maintenance of an adequate supply of this necessary commodity; that it is a policy of this state to promote, foster and encourage the intelligent production and orderly marketing of commodities necessary to its citizens, including fluid milk and fluid cream, and to eliminate speculation, waste, improper marketing, unfair and destructive trade practices, and improper accounting for milk purchased from producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 927.)
-------------------------------------------

62702.
